Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.16 RCW to read as follows:The term "noncitizen" means an individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States.Sec. 2. RCW 1.20.130 and 2002 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) All state and local government statutes, codes, rules, regulations, and other official documents enacted after July 1, 2002, are required to use the term "Asian" when referring to persons of Asian descent. The use of the term "Oriental" is prohibited.(((2)))(b) The legislature urges all state and local entities to review their statutes, codes, rules, regulations, and other official documents and revise them to omit the use of the term "Oriental" when referring to persons of Asian descent.(2) Except where required by federal law or necessary to comply with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, all state and local government statutes, codes, rules, regulations, and other official documents enacted after July 1, 2026, shall use the term "noncitizen" or other context-appropriate term, instead of the term "alien," when referring to an individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States. The legislature urges all state and local entities to review their statutes, codes, rules, regulations, and other official documents and revise them to omit the use of the term "alien" when referring to an individual who is not a citizen or national of the Unites States.Sec. 3. RCW 4.16.210 and 1941 c 174 s 1, part are each amended to read as follows:When a person ((shall be an alien))who is not a citizen or national of the United States and who is a subject or ((a)) citizen of a country at war with the United States, the time of the continuance of the war shall not be a part of the period limited for the commencement of the action.Sec. 4. RCW 7.68.030 and 2024 c 62 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It shall be the duty of the director to establish and administer a program of benefits to innocent victims of criminal acts within the terms and limitations of this chapter. The director may apply for and, subject to appropriation, expend federal funds under Public Law 98-473 and any other federal program providing financial assistance to state crime victim compensation programs. The federal funds shall be deposited in the state general fund and may be expended only for purposes authorized by applicable federal law.(2) The director shall:(a) Establish and adopt rules governing the administration of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;(b) Regulate the proof of accident and extent thereof, the proof of death, and the proof of relationship and the extent of dependency;(c) Supervise the medical, surgical, and hospital treatment to the intent that it may be in all cases efficient and up to the recognized standard of modern surgery;(d) Issue proper receipts for moneys received and certificates for benefits accrued or accruing;(e) Designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW;(f) Supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician assistants governed by the provisions of chapter 18.71A RCW, including chiropractic care, and including care provided by licensed advanced registered nurse practitioners, to victims at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, electronic communications, rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment. The medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule. The department may recommend to a victim particular health care services and providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost-effective payment levels or rates are obtained by the department, and the department may enter into contracts for goods and services including, but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide access to quality service is maintained for injured victims;(g) In consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist, licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistants as defined in chapter 18.71A RCW, acting under the supervision of or in coordination with a participating physician, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or other agency or person rendering services to victims. The department shall coordinate with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered under this title, including services provided to victims, whether ((aliens))noncitizens or other victims, who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16). Payments for providers' services under the fee schedule established pursuant to this subsection (2) may not be less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program under Title 51 RCW, provided:(i) If the department, using caseload estimates, projects a deficit in funding for the program by July 15th for the following fiscal year, the director shall notify the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature and request funding sufficient to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program. If sufficient funding is not provided to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, the director shall reduce the payments under the fee schedule for the following fiscal year based on caseload estimates and available funding, except payments may not be reduced to less than seventy percent of payments for comparable services under the workers' compensation program;(ii) If an unforeseeable catastrophic event results in insufficient funding to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, the director shall reduce the payments under the fee schedule to not less than seventy percent of payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, provided that the reduction may not be more than necessary to fund benefits under the program; and(iii) Once sufficient funding is provided or otherwise available, the director shall increase the payments under the fee schedule to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program;(h) Make a record of the commencement of every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of injured victims, shall approve and pay those which conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules, regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted under it.(3) The director and his or her authorized assistants:(a) Have power to issue subpoenas to enforce the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production and examination of books, papers, photographs, tapes, and records before the department in connection with any claim made to the department or any billing submitted to the department. The superior court has the power to enforce any such subpoena by proper proceedings;(b)(i) May apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county. The application must (A) state that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection; (B) adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and (C) declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's authority.(ii) Where the application under this subsection (3)(b) is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.(iii) The director and his or her authorized assistants may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this subsection without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.(4) In all hearings, actions, or proceedings before the department, any physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner having theretofore examined or treated the claimant may be required to testify fully regarding such examination or treatment, and shall not be exempt from so testifying by reason of the relation of the physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner to the patient.Sec. 5. RCW 7.68.030 and 2025 c 58 s 5058 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It shall be the duty of the director to establish and administer a program of benefits to innocent victims of criminal acts within the terms and limitations of this chapter. The director may apply for and, subject to appropriation, expend federal funds under ((Public Law [P.L.]))P.L. 98-473 and any other federal program providing financial assistance to state crime victim compensation programs. The federal funds shall be deposited in the state general fund and may be expended only for purposes authorized by applicable federal law.(2) The director shall:(a) Establish and adopt rules governing the administration of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;(b) Regulate the proof of accident and extent thereof, the proof of death, and the proof of relationship and the extent of dependency;(c) Supervise the medical, surgical, and hospital treatment to the intent that it may be in all cases efficient and up to the recognized standard of modern surgery;(d) Issue proper receipts for moneys received and certificates for benefits accrued or accruing;(e) Designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW;(f) Supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician assistants governed by the provisions of chapter 18.71A RCW, including chiropractic care, and including care provided by licensed advanced practice registered nurses, to victims at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, electronic communications, rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment. The medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule. The department may recommend to a victim particular health care services and providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost-effective payment levels or rates are obtained by the department, and the department may enter into contracts for goods and services including, but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide access to quality service is maintained for injured victims;(g) In consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistants as defined in chapter 18.71A RCW, acting under the supervision of or in coordination with a participating physician, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or other agency or person rendering services to victims. The department shall coordinate with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered under this title, including services provided to victims, whether ((aliens))noncitizens or other victims, who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16). Payments for providers' services under the fee schedule established pursuant to this subsection (2) may not be less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program under Title 51 RCW, provided:(i) If the department, using caseload estimates, projects a deficit in funding for the program by July 15th for the following fiscal year, the director shall notify the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature and request funding sufficient to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program. If sufficient funding is not provided to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, the director shall reduce the payments under the fee schedule for the following fiscal year based on caseload estimates and available funding, except payments may not be reduced to less than seventy percent of payments for comparable services under the workers' compensation program;(ii) If an unforeseeable catastrophic event results in insufficient funding to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, the director shall reduce the payments under the fee schedule to not less than seventy percent of payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, provided that the reduction may not be more than necessary to fund benefits under the program; and(iii) Once sufficient funding is provided or otherwise available, the director shall increase the payments under the fee schedule to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program;(h) Make a record of the commencement of every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of injured victims, shall approve and pay those which conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules, regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted under it.(3) The director and his or her authorized assistants:(a) Have power to issue subpoenas to enforce the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production and examination of books, papers, photographs, tapes, and records before the department in connection with any claim made to the department or any billing submitted to the department. The superior court has the power to enforce any such subpoena by proper proceedings;(b)(i) May apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county. The application must (A) state that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection; (B) adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and (C) declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's authority.(ii) Where the application under this subsection (3)(b) is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.(iii) The director and his or her authorized assistants may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this subsection without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.(4) In all hearings, actions, or proceedings before the department, any physician or licensed advanced practice registered nurse having theretofore examined or treated the claimant may be required to testify fully regarding such examination or treatment, and shall not be exempt from so testifying by reason of the relation of the physician or licensed advanced practice registered nurse to the patient.Sec. 6. RCW 7.68.077 and 2011 c 346 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:Except as otherwise provided by treaty or this chapter, whenever compensation is payable to a beneficiary who is ((an alien not residing))not a citizen or national of the United States and who does not reside in the United States, the department shall pay the compensation to which a resident beneficiary is eligible under this chapter. But if a ((nonresident alien))noncitizen beneficiary not residing in the United States is a citizen of a government having a compensation law which excludes citizens of the United States, either resident or nonresident, from partaking of the benefit of such law in as favorable a degree as herein extended to ((nonresident aliens))noncitizens not residing in the United States, he or she shall receive no compensation. No payment shall be made to any beneficiary residing in any country with which the United States does not maintain diplomatic relations when such payment is due.Sec. 7. RCW 7.68.094 and 2024 c 297 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any victim eligible to receive any benefits or claiming such under this title shall, if requested by the department submit himself or herself for medical examination, at a time and from time to time, at a place reasonably convenient for the victim as may be provided by the rules of the department. An injured victim, whether ((an alien))a noncitizen or other injured victim, who is not residing in the United States at the time that a medical examination is requested may be required to submit to an examination at any location in the United States determined by the department.(2) If the victim refuses to submit to medical examination, or obstructs the same, or, if any injured victim shall persist in unsanitary or injurious practices which tend to imperil or ((retard))delay his or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit to such medical or surgical treatment as is reasonably essential to his or her recovery does not cooperate in reasonable efforts at such rehabilitation, the department may suspend any further action on any claim of such victim so long as such refusal, obstruction, noncooperation, or practice continues and thus, the department may reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation for such period. The department may not suspend any further action on any claim of a victim or reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation if a victim has good cause for refusing to submit to or to obstruct any examination, evaluation, treatment, or practice requested by the department or required under this section.(3) If the victim necessarily incurs traveling expenses in attending the examination pursuant to the request of the department, such reasonable round-trip traveling expenses shall be repaid to him or her upon proper voucher and audit.(4) If the medical examination required by this section causes the victim to be absent from his or her work without pay, the victim shall be paid compensation in an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work while attending the medical examination when the victim is insured by the department.Sec. 8. RCW 9.41.010 and 2024 c 289 s 1 and 2024 c 62 s 32 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.(2)(a) "Assault weapon" means:(i) Any of the following specific firearms regardless of which company produced and manufactured the firearm:AK-47 in all formsAK-74 in all formsAlgimec AGM-1 type semiautomaticAmerican Arms Spectre da semiautomatic carbineAR15, M16, or M4 in all formsAR 180 type semiautomaticArgentine L.S.R. semiautomaticAustralian AutomaticAuto-Ordnance Thompson M1 and 1927 semiautomaticsBarrett .50 cal light semiautomaticBarrett .50 cal M87Barrett .50 cal M107A1Barrett REC7Beretta AR70/S70 type semiautomaticBushmaster Carbon 15Bushmaster ACRBushmaster XM-15Bushmaster MOECalico models M100 and M900CETME SporterCIS SR 88 type semiautomaticColt CAR 15Daewoo K-1Daewoo K-2Dragunov semiautomaticFabrique Nationale FAL in all formsFabrique Nationale F2000Fabrique Nationale L1A1 SporterFabrique Nationale M249SFabrique Nationale PS90Fabrique Nationale SCARFAMAS .223 semiautomaticGalilHeckler & Koch G3 in all formsHeckler & Koch HK-41/91Heckler & Koch HK-43/93Heckler & Koch HK94A2/3Heckler & Koch MP-5 in all formsHeckler & Koch PSG-1Heckler & Koch SL8Heckler & Koch UMPManchester Arms Commando MK-45Manchester Arms MK-9SAR-4800SIG AMT SG510 in all formsSIG SG550 in all formsSKSSpectre M4Springfield Armory BM-59Springfield Armory G3Springfield Armory SAR-8Springfield Armory SAR-48Springfield Armory SAR-3Springfield Armory M-21 sniperSpringfield Armory M1ASmith & Wesson M&P 15Sterling Mk 1Sterling Mk 6/7Steyr AUGTNW M230FAMAS F11Uzi 9mm carbine/rifle(ii) A semiautomatic rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches;(iii) A conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which an assault weapon can be assembled or from which a firearm can be converted into an assault weapon if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person; or(iv) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:(A) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;(B) Thumbhole stock;(C) Folding or telescoping stock;(D) Forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;(E) Flash suppressor, flash guard, flash eliminator, flash hider, sound suppressor, silencer, or any item designed to reduce the visual or audio signature of the firearm;(F) Muzzle brake, recoil compensator, or any item designed to be affixed to the barrel to reduce recoil or muzzle rise;(G) Threaded barrel designed to attach a flash suppressor, sound suppressor, muzzle break, or similar item;(H) Grenade launcher or flare launcher; or(I) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel;(v) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds;(vi) A semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:(A) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer;(B) A second hand grip;(C) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel; or(D) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip;(vii) A semiautomatic shotgun that has any of the following:(A) A folding or telescoping stock;(B) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;(C) A thumbhole stock;(D) A forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;(E) A fixed magazine in excess of seven rounds; or(F) A revolving cylinder shotgun.(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "fixed magazine" means an ammunition feeding device contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm action.(c) "Assault weapon" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.(3) "Assemble" means to fit together component parts.(4) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.(5) "Bump-fire stock" means a butt stock designed to be attached to a semiautomatic firearm with the effect of increasing the rate of fire achievable with the semiautomatic firearm to that of a fully automatic firearm by using the energy from the recoil of the firearm to generate reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation of the trigger.(6) "Conviction" or "convicted" means, whether in an adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, that a plea of guilty has been accepted or a verdict of guilty has been filed, or a finding of guilt has been entered, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including, but not limited to, sentencing or disposition, posttrial or post-fact-finding motions, and appeals. "Conviction" includes a dismissal entered after a period of probation, suspension, or deferral of sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in jurisdictions other than Washington state.(7) "Crime of violence" means:(a) Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second degree;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this subsection; and(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.(8) "Curio or relic" has the same meaning as provided in 27 C.F.R. Sec. 478.11.(9) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of his or her personal collection of firearms.(10) "Detachable magazine" means an ammunition feeding device that can be loaded or unloaded while detached from a firearm and readily inserted into a firearm.(11) "Distribute" means to give out, provide, make available, or deliver a firearm or large capacity magazine to any person in this state, with or without consideration, whether the distributor is in-state or out-of-state. "Distribute" includes, but is not limited to, filling orders placed in this state, online or otherwise. "Distribute" also includes causing a firearm or large capacity magazine to be delivered in this state.(12) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.99.020.(13) "Family or household member" has the same meaning as in RCW 7.105.010.(14) "Federal firearms dealer" means a licensed dealer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(11).(15) "Federal firearms importer" means a licensed importer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(9).(16) "Federal firearms manufacturer" means a licensed manufacturer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(10).(17) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this state.(18) "Felony firearm offender" means a person who has previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state of any felony firearm offense. A person is not a felony firearm offender under this chapter if any and all qualifying offenses have been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate, or rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence.(19) "Felony firearm offense" means:(a) Any felony offense that is a violation of this chapter;(b) A violation of RCW 9A.36.045;(c) A violation of RCW 9A.56.300;(d) A violation of RCW 9A.56.310;(e) Any felony offense if the offender was armed with a firearm in the commission of the offense.(20) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder. For the purposes of RCW 9.41.040, "firearm" also includes frames and receivers. "Firearm" does not include a flare gun or other pyrotechnic visual distress signaling device, or a powder-actuated tool or other device designed solely to be used for construction purposes.(21)(a) "Frame or receiver" means a part of a firearm that, when the complete firearm is assembled, is visible from the exterior and provides housing or a structure designed to hold or integrate one or more fire control components, even if pins or other attachments are required to connect the fire control components. Any such part identified with a serial number shall be presumed, absent an official determination by the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives or other reliable evidence to the contrary, to be a frame or receiver.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "fire control component" means a component necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete, or continue the firing sequence, including any of the following: Hammer, bolt, bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, firing pin, striker, or slide rails.(22) "Gun" has the same meaning as firearm.(23) "Import" means to move, transport, or receive an item from a place outside the territorial limits of the state of Washington to a place inside the territorial limits of the state of Washington. "Import" does not mean situations where an individual possesses a large capacity magazine or assault weapon when departing from, and returning to, Washington state, so long as the individual is returning to Washington in possession of the same large capacity magazine or assault weapon the individual transported out of state.(24) "Intimate partner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 7.105.010.(25) "Large capacity magazine" means an ammunition feeding device with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds of ammunition, or any conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which such a device can be assembled if those parts are in possession of or under the control of the same person, but shall not be construed to include any of the following:(a) An ammunition feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds of ammunition;(b) A 22 caliber tube ammunition feeding device; or(c) A tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.(26) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol.(27) "Lawful permanent resident" has the same meaning afforded a person "lawfully admitted for permanent residence" in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20).(28) "Licensed collector" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(b).(29) "Licensed dealer" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a).(30) "Loaded" means:(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;(b) Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the firearm;(c) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;(d) There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or(e) There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle loader.(31) "Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt, or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.(32) "Manufacture" means, with respect to a firearm or large capacity magazine, the fabrication, making, formation, production, or construction of a firearm or large capacity magazine, by manual labor or by machinery.(33) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, or physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, social worker, mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or such other mental health professionals as may be defined in statute or by rules adopted by the department of health pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW.(34) "Nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen" means a person ((defined as such in))who meets the definition of "nonimmigrant alien" under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15).(35) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, club, organization, society, joint stock company, or other legal entity.(36) "Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than 16 inches in length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.(37) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.(38) "Sale" and "sell" mean the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment.(39) "Secure gun storage" means:(a) A locked box, gun safe, or other secure locked storage space that is designed to prevent unauthorized use or discharge of a firearm; and(b) The act of keeping an unloaded firearm stored by such means.(40) "Semiautomatic" means any firearm which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.(41)(a) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" means any rifle which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.(b) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.(42) "Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:(a) Any crime of violence;(b) Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 10 years;(c) Child molestation in the second degree;(d) Incest when committed against a child under age 14;(e) Indecent liberties;(f) Leading organized crime;(g) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;(h) Rape in the third degree;(i) Drive-by shooting;(j) Sexual exploitation;(k) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;(l) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(m) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;(n) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;(o) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense;(p) Any felony conviction under RCW 9.41.115; or(q) Any felony charged under RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).(43) "Sex offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030.(44) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less than 16 inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.(45) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels less than 18 inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.(46) "Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.(47) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified under chapter 18.205 RCW.(48) "Transfer" means the intended delivery of a firearm to another person without consideration of payment or promise of payment including, but not limited to, gifts and loans. "Transfer" does not include the delivery of a firearm owned or leased by an entity licensed or qualified to do business in the state of Washington to, or return of such a firearm by, any of that entity's employees or agents, defined to include volunteers participating in an honor guard, for lawful purposes in the ordinary course of business.(49) "Undetectable firearm" means any firearm that is not as detectable as 3.7 ounces of 17-4 PH stainless steel by walk-through metal detectors or magnetometers commonly used at airports or any firearm where the barrel, the slide or cylinder, or the frame or receiver of the firearm would not generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the part when examined by the types of X-ray machines commonly used at airports.(50)(a) "Unfinished frame or receiver" means a frame or receiver that is partially complete, disassembled, or inoperable, that: (i) Has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled, converted, or restored to a functional state; or (ii) is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once finished or completed, including without limitation products marketed or sold to the public as an 80 percent frame or receiver or unfinished frame or receiver.(b) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Readily" means a process that is fairly or reasonably efficient, quick, and easy, but not necessarily the most efficient, speedy, or easy process. Factors relevant in making this determination, with no single one controlling, include the following: (A) Time, i.e., how long it takes to finish the process; (B) ease, i.e., how difficult it is to do so; (C) expertise, i.e., what knowledge and skills are required; (D) equipment, i.e., what tools are required; (E) availability, i.e., whether additional parts are required, and how easily they can be obtained; (F) expense, i.e., how much it costs; (G) scope, i.e., the extent to which the subject of the process must be changed to finish it; and (H) feasibility, i.e., whether the process would damage or destroy the subject of the process, or cause it to malfunction.(ii) "Partially complete," as it modifies frame or receiver, means a forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it is clearly identifiable as an unfinished component part of a firearm.(51) "Unlicensed person" means any person who is not a licensed dealer under this chapter.(52) "Untraceable firearm" means any firearm manufactured after July 1, 2019, that is not an antique firearm and that cannot be traced by law enforcement by means of a serial number affixed to the firearm by a federal firearms manufacturer, federal firearms importer, or federal firearms dealer in compliance with all federal laws and regulations.(53) "Washington state patrol firearms background check program" means the division within the state patrol that conducts background checks for all firearm transfers and the disposition of firearms.Sec. 9. RCW 9.41.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5064 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.(2)(a) "Assault weapon" means:(i) Any of the following specific firearms regardless of which company produced and manufactured the firearm:AK-47 in all formsAK-74 in all formsAlgimec AGM-1 type semiautomaticAmerican Arms Spectre da semiautomatic carbineAR15, M16, or M4 in all formsAR 180 type semiautomaticArgentine L.S.R. semiautomaticAustralian AutomaticAuto-Ordnance Thompson M1 and 1927 semiautomaticsBarrett .50 cal light semiautomaticBarrett .50 cal M87Barrett .50 cal M107A1Barrett REC7Beretta AR70/S70 type semiautomaticBushmaster Carbon 15Bushmaster ACRBushmaster XM-15Bushmaster MOECalico models M100 and M900CETME SporterCIS SR 88 type semiautomaticColt CAR 15Daewoo K-1Daewoo K-2Dragunov semiautomaticFabrique Nationale FAL in all formsFabrique Nationale F2000Fabrique Nationale L1A1 SporterFabrique Nationale M249SFabrique Nationale PS90Fabrique Nationale SCARFAMAS .223 semiautomaticGalilHeckler & Koch G3 in all formsHeckler & Koch HK-41/91Heckler & Koch HK-43/93Heckler & Koch HK94A2/3Heckler & Koch MP-5 in all formsHeckler & Koch PSG-1Heckler & Koch SL8Heckler & Koch UMPManchester Arms Commando MK-45Manchester Arms MK-9SAR-4800SIG AMT SG510 in all formsSIG SG550 in all formsSKSSpectre M4Springfield Armory BM-59Springfield Armory G3Springfield Armory SAR-8Springfield Armory SAR-48Springfield Armory SAR-3Springfield Armory M-21 sniperSpringfield Armory M1ASmith & Wesson M&P 15Sterling Mk 1Sterling Mk 6/7Steyr AUGTNW M230FAMAS F11Uzi 9mm carbine/rifle(ii) A semiautomatic rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches;(iii) A conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which an assault weapon can be assembled or from which a firearm can be converted into an assault weapon if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person; or(iv) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:(A) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;(B) Thumbhole stock;(C) Folding or telescoping stock;(D) Forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;(E) Flash suppressor, flash guard, flash eliminator, flash hider, sound suppressor, silencer, or any item designed to reduce the visual or audio signature of the firearm;(F) Muzzle brake, recoil compensator, or any item designed to be affixed to the barrel to reduce recoil or muzzle rise;(G) Threaded barrel designed to attach a flash suppressor, sound suppressor, muzzle break, or similar item;(H) Grenade launcher or flare launcher; or(I) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel;(v) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds;(vi) A semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:(A) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer;(B) A second hand grip;(C) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel; or(D) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip;(vii) A semiautomatic shotgun that has any of the following:(A) A folding or telescoping stock;(B) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;(C) A thumbhole stock;(D) A forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;(E) A fixed magazine in excess of seven rounds; or(F) A revolving cylinder shotgun.(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "fixed magazine" means an ammunition feeding device contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm action.(c) "Assault weapon" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.(3) "Assemble" means to fit together component parts.(4) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.(5) "Bump-fire stock" means a butt stock designed to be attached to a semiautomatic firearm with the effect of increasing the rate of fire achievable with the semiautomatic firearm to that of a fully automatic firearm by using the energy from the recoil of the firearm to generate reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation of the trigger.(6) "Conviction" or "convicted" means, whether in an adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, that a plea of guilty has been accepted or a verdict of guilty has been filed, or a finding of guilt has been entered, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including, but not limited to, sentencing or disposition, posttrial or post-fact-finding motions, and appeals. "Conviction" includes a dismissal entered after a period of probation, suspension, or deferral of sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in jurisdictions other than Washington state.(7) "Crime of violence" means:(a) Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second degree;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this subsection; and(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.(8) "Curio or relic" has the same meaning as provided in 27 C.F.R. Sec. 478.11.(9) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of his or her personal collection of firearms.(10) "Detachable magazine" means an ammunition feeding device that can be loaded or unloaded while detached from a firearm and readily inserted into a firearm.(11) "Distribute" means to give out, provide, make available, or deliver a firearm or large capacity magazine to any person in this state, with or without consideration, whether the distributor is in-state or out-of-state. "Distribute" includes, but is not limited to, filling orders placed in this state, online or otherwise. "Distribute" also includes causing a firearm or large capacity magazine to be delivered in this state.(12) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.99.020.(13) "Family or household member" has the same meaning as in RCW 7.105.010.(14) "Federal firearms dealer" means a licensed dealer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(11).(15) "Federal firearms importer" means a licensed importer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(9).(16) "Federal firearms manufacturer" means a licensed manufacturer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(10).(17) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this state.(18) "Felony firearm offender" means a person who has previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state of any felony firearm offense. A person is not a felony firearm offender under this chapter if any and all qualifying offenses have been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate, or rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence.(19) "Felony firearm offense" means:(a) Any felony offense that is a violation of this chapter;(b) A violation of RCW 9A.36.045;(c) A violation of RCW 9A.56.300;(d) A violation of RCW 9A.56.310;(e) Any felony offense if the offender was armed with a firearm in the commission of the offense.(20) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder. For the purposes of RCW 9.41.040, "firearm" also includes frames and receivers. "Firearm" does not include a flare gun or other pyrotechnic visual distress signaling device, or a powder-actuated tool or other device designed solely to be used for construction purposes.(21)(a) "Frame or receiver" means a part of a firearm that, when the complete firearm is assembled, is visible from the exterior and provides housing or a structure designed to hold or integrate one or more fire control components, even if pins or other attachments are required to connect the fire control components. Any such part identified with a serial number shall be presumed, absent an official determination by the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives or other reliable evidence to the contrary, to be a frame or receiver.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "fire control component" means a component necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete, or continue the firing sequence, including any of the following: Hammer, bolt, bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, firing pin, striker, or slide rails.(22) "Gun" has the same meaning as firearm.(23) "Import" means to move, transport, or receive an item from a place outside the territorial limits of the state of Washington to a place inside the territorial limits of the state of Washington. "Import" does not mean situations where an individual possesses a large capacity magazine or assault weapon when departing from, and returning to, Washington state, so long as the individual is returning to Washington in possession of the same large capacity magazine or assault weapon the individual transported out of state.(24) "Intimate partner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 7.105.010.(25) "Large capacity magazine" means an ammunition feeding device with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds of ammunition, or any conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which such a device can be assembled if those parts are in possession of or under the control of the same person, but shall not be construed to include any of the following:(a) An ammunition feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds of ammunition;(b) A 22 caliber tube ammunition feeding device; or(c) A tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.(26) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol.(27) "Lawful permanent resident" has the same meaning afforded a person "lawfully admitted for permanent residence" in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20).(28) "Licensed collector" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(b).(29) "Licensed dealer" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a).(30) "Loaded" means:(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;(b) Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the firearm;(c) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;(d) There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or(e) There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle loader.(31) "Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt, or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.(32) "Manufacture" means, with respect to a firearm or large capacity magazine, the fabrication, making, formation, production, or construction of a firearm or large capacity magazine, by manual labor or by machinery.(33) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, or physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychiatric nurse, social worker, mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or such other mental health professionals as may be defined in statute or by rules adopted by the department of health pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW.(34) "Nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen" means a person ((defined as such in))who meets the definition of "nonimmigrant alien" under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15).(35) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, club, organization, society, joint stock company, or other legal entity.(36) "Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than 16 inches in length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.(37) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.(38) "Sale" and "sell" mean the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment.(39) "Secure gun storage" means:(a) A locked box, gun safe, or other secure locked storage space that is designed to prevent unauthorized use or discharge of a firearm; and(b) The act of keeping an unloaded firearm stored by such means.(40) "Semiautomatic" means any firearm which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.(41)(a) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" means any rifle which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.(b) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.(42) "Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:(a) Any crime of violence;(b) Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 10 years;(c) Child molestation in the second degree;(d) Incest when committed against a child under age 14;(e) Indecent liberties;(f) Leading organized crime;(g) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;(h) Rape in the third degree;(i) Drive-by shooting;(j) Sexual exploitation;(k) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;(l) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(m) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;(n) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;(o) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense;(p) Any felony conviction under RCW 9.41.115; or(q) Any felony charged under RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).(43) "Sex offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030.(44) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less than 16 inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.(45) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels less than 18 inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.(46) "Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.(47) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified under chapter 18.205 RCW.(48) "Transfer" means the intended delivery of a firearm to another person without consideration of payment or promise of payment including, but not limited to, gifts and loans. "Transfer" does not include the delivery of a firearm owned or leased by an entity licensed or qualified to do business in the state of Washington to, or return of such a firearm by, any of that entity's employees or agents, defined to include volunteers participating in an honor guard, for lawful purposes in the ordinary course of business.(49) "Undetectable firearm" means any firearm that is not as detectable as 3.7 ounces of 17-4 PH stainless steel by walk-through metal detectors or magnetometers commonly used at airports or any firearm where the barrel, the slide or cylinder, or the frame or receiver of the firearm would not generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the part when examined by the types of X-ray machines commonly used at airports.(50)(a) "Unfinished frame or receiver" means a frame or receiver that is partially complete, disassembled, or inoperable, that: (i) Has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled, converted, or restored to a functional state; or (ii) is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once finished or completed, including without limitation products marketed or sold to the public as an 80 percent frame or receiver or unfinished frame or receiver.(b) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Readily" means a process that is fairly or reasonably efficient, quick, and easy, but not necessarily the most efficient, speedy, or easy process. Factors relevant in making this determination, with no single one controlling, include the following: (A) Time, i.e., how long it takes to finish the process; (B) ease, i.e., how difficult it is to do so; (C) expertise, i.e., what knowledge and skills are required; (D) equipment, i.e., what tools are required; (E) availability, i.e., whether additional parts are required, and how easily they can be obtained; (F) expense, i.e., how much it costs; (G) scope, i.e., the extent to which the subject of the process must be changed to finish it; and (H) feasibility, i.e., whether the process would damage or destroy the subject of the process, or cause it to malfunction.(ii) "Partially complete," as it modifies frame or receiver, means a forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it is clearly identifiable as an unfinished component part of a firearm.(51) "Unlicensed person" means any person who is not a licensed dealer under this chapter.(52) "Untraceable firearm" means any firearm manufactured after July 1, 2019, that is not an antique firearm and that cannot be traced by law enforcement by means of a serial number affixed to the firearm by a federal firearms manufacturer, federal firearms importer, or federal firearms dealer in compliance with all federal laws and regulations.(53) "Washington state patrol firearms background check program" means the division within the state patrol that conducts background checks for all firearm transfers and the disposition of firearms.Sec. 10. RCW 9.41.070 and 2021 c 215 s 94 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person within this state for five years from date of issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business, sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be denied, unless:(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law;(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, or RCW 9A.46.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.26B.020, or 26.26A.470, or any of the former RCW 10.14.080, 26.10.115, 26.50.060, and 26.50.070;(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person.No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.(2)(a) The issuing authority shall conduct a check through the national instant criminal background check system, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law, and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(b) The issuing authority shall deny a permit to anyone who is found to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law.(c) (a) and (b) of this subsection apply whether the applicant is applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.(d) A background check for an original license must be conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and shall include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation through the submission of fingerprints. The results will be returned to the issuing authority. The applicant may request and receive a copy of the results of the background check from the issuing authority. If the applicant seeks to amend or correct their record, the applicant must contact the Washington state patrol for a Washington state record or the federal bureau of investigation for records from other jurisdictions.(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by this chapter.(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, email address at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state identification card number if used for identification in applying for the license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 and federal law to possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the applicant must provide the applicant's country of citizenship, United States issued alien number or admission number, and the basis on which the applicant claims to be exempt from federal prohibitions on firearm possession by ((aliens))noncitizens. The applicant shall not be required to produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.173 upon application. The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.A photograph of the applicant may be required as part of the application and printed on the face of the license.The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this subsection.(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license.The fee shall be distributed as follows:(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(d) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and(e) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(c) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and(d) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the issuing authority.(9)(a) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Three dollars shall be deposited in the limited fish and wildlife account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and(ii) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.(b) Beginning with concealed pistol licenses that expire on or after August 1, 2018, the department of licensing shall mail a renewal notice approximately ninety days before the license expiration date to the licensee at the address listed on the concealed pistol license application, or to the licensee's new address if the licensee has notified the department of licensing of a change of address. Alternatively, if the licensee provides an email address at the time of license application, the department of licensing may send the renewal notice to the licensee's email address. The notice must contain the date the concealed pistol license will expire, the amount of renewal fee, the penalty for late renewal, and instructions on how to renew the license.(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through (9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an unincorporated area; or(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.(14) Any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service may renew his or her license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service, if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if appropriate, a copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this subsection (14) shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license under this subsection (14) shall pay only the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section and shall not be required to pay a late renewal penalty in addition to the renewal fee.(15)(a) By October 1, 2019, law enforcement agencies that issue concealed pistol licenses shall develop and implement a procedure for the renewal of concealed pistol licenses through a mail application process, and may develop an online renewal application process, for any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service.(b) A person applying for a license renewal under this subsection shall:(i) Provide a copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service;(ii) Apply for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license; and(iii) Pay the renewal licensing fee under subsection (6) of this section, and, if applicable, the late renewal penalty under subsection (9) of this section.(c) A license renewed under this subsection takes effect on the expiration date of the prior license and is valid for a period of one year.Sec. 11. RCW 9.41.070 and 2025 c 370 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of any person, issue a license to such person to carry a concealed pistol within this state for five years from date of issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business, sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.A concealed pistol license application shall be issued unless the applicant is disqualified because the applicant:(a) Is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law;(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;(c) Is under twenty-one years of age;(d) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, or RCW 9A.46.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.26B.020, or 26.26A.470, or any of the former RCW 10.14.080, 26.10.115, 26.50.060, and 26.50.070;(e) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;(f) Has an outstanding warrant for the applicant's arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor;(g) Has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application for a concealed pistol license; or(h) Has failed to produce a certificate of completion from a certified concealed carry firearms safety training program within the last five years, as provided under subsection (5) of this section and RCW 43.43.575, or proof that the applicant is exempt from the training requirement.No person convicted of a felony may have the person's right to possess firearms restored or privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.(2)(a) The issuing authority shall conduct a check through the national instant criminal background check system, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the administrative office of the courts, LInX-NW, the health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law, and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(b) The issuing authority shall deny a license to anyone who is found to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state law or otherwise disqualified from obtaining a concealed pistol license under the requirements of this section.(c) (a) and (b) of this subsection apply whether the applicant is applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.(d) A background check for an original license must be conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and shall include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation through the submission of fingerprints. The results will be returned to the issuing authority. The applicant may request and receive a copy of the results of the background check from the issuing authority. If the applicant seeks to amend or correct their record, the applicant must contact the Washington state patrol for a Washington state record or the federal bureau of investigation for records from other jurisdictions. An applicant presenting a valid permit to purchase firearms is exempt from the fingerprint check requirement in a concealed pistol license application.(e)(i) If an application for a concealed pistol license is denied, the issuing authority shall send the applicant a written notice of the denial citing the specific statute under which the application is denied, and providing specific details regarding the grounds for denial in compliance with rules governing the dissemination of criminal history information. If the applicant provides an email address at the time of application, the issuing authority may send the denial notice to the applicant's email address. The written notice also must include information on the procedure for an applicant to request that the issuing authority reconsider the denial of the application.(ii) If the issuing authority after reconsideration upholds the decision to deny the application, the applicant may seek judicial relief of the denial in superior court pursuant to RCW 9.41.0975.(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have the person's right to acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by this chapter.(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, email address at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, physical description, a complete set of fingerprints unless the applicant presents a valid permit to purchase firearms issued under RCW 9.41.121, signature of the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state identification card number if used for identification in applying for the license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol unless the applicant presents a valid permit to purchase firearms issued under RCW 9.41.121.The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 and federal law to possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the applicant must provide the applicant's country of citizenship, United States issued alien number or admission number, and the basis on which the applicant claims to be exempt from federal prohibitions on firearm possession by ((aliens))noncitizens. The applicant shall not be required to produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.173 upon application. The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.A photograph of the applicant may be required as part of the application and printed on the face of the license.The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this subsection.(5)(a) The training required for issuance of a license under this section must be from a concealed carry firearms safety training program certified under RCW 43.43.575 that includes live-fire shooting exercises on a firing range that include a demonstration by the applicant of the safe handling of, and shooting proficiency with, firearms, including a minimum of 50 rounds of ammunition firing training at a firing range under the supervision of an instructor.(b) Concealed pistol license applicants are exempt from the training requirement in this section if they can demonstrate they are exempt under RCW 9.41.1132(5).(6)(a) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license.The fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(ii) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;(iii) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(iv) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and(v) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.(b) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;(ii) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter;(iii) Two dollars and sixteen cents to the firearms range account in the general fund; and(iv) Eighty-four cents to the concealed pistol license renewal notification account created in RCW 43.79.540.(c) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.(d) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the issuing authority.(7)(a) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:(i) Three dollars shall be deposited in the limited fish and wildlife account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and(ii) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.(b) Beginning with concealed pistol licenses that expire on or after August 1, 2018, the department of licensing shall mail a renewal notice approximately ninety days before the license expiration date to the licensee at the address listed on the concealed pistol license application, or to the licensee's new address if the licensee has notified the department of licensing of a change of address. Alternatively, if the licensee provides an email address at the time of license application, the department of licensing may send the renewal notice to the licensee's email address. The notice must contain the date the concealed pistol license will expire, the amount of renewal fee, the penalty for late renewal, and instructions on how to renew the license.(8) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through (7) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.(9) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.(10) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol license.(11) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an unincorporated area; or(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.(12) Any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew a license under subsection (7) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service may renew the license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service, if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if appropriate, a copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license renewed under this subsection shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license under this subsection shall pay only the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section and shall not be required to pay a late renewal penalty in addition to the renewal fee.(13)(a) By October 1, 2019, law enforcement agencies that issue concealed pistol licenses shall develop and implement a procedure for the renewal of concealed pistol licenses through a mail application process, and may develop an online renewal application process, for any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew a license under subsection (7) of this section because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service.(b) A person applying for a license renewal under this subsection shall:(i) Provide a copy of the person's original order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service;(ii) Apply for renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license; and(iii) Pay the renewal licensing fee under subsection (6) of this section, and, if applicable, the late renewal penalty under subsection (7) of this section.(c) A license renewed under this subsection takes effect on the expiration date of the prior license and is valid for a period of one year.(14) Not later than one year after May 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, issuing authorities shall submit aggregate license application data as set forth in this section to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program for statewide analysis of the uniformity of the licensing system and any potential demographic disparities. Not later than 18 months after May 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall submit to the state legislature a report that includes all of the following information, to the extent available, regarding concealed pistol licenses for the preceding year:(a) The number of license applications submitted, issued, and denied;(b) Aggregate and anonymized demographic data on the number of applicants seeking licenses that were issued, including race, gender, date of birth, and county of residence;(c) Aggregate and anonymized demographic data on the number of applicants seeking licenses that were denied, including race, gender, date of birth, and county of residence;(d) The frequency with which licenses were denied for each of the statutory disqualifying factors listed in this section;(e) The number of license denial decisions appealed by license applicants and the disposition of those appeals;(f) The number of issued licenses revoked; and(g) Information on the barriers, if any, to compiling and analyzing the information listed in (a) through (f) of this subsection.Sec. 12. RCW 9.41.0975 and 2023 c 161 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The state, local governmental entities, any public or private agency, and the employees of any state or local governmental entity or public or private agency, acting in good faith, are immune from liability:(a) For failure to prevent the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person whose receipt or possession of the firearm is unlawful;(b) For preventing the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person who may lawfully receive or possess a firearm;(c) For issuing a concealed pistol license or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license to a person ineligible for such a license;(d) For failing to issue a concealed pistol license or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license to a person eligible for such a license;(e) For revoking or failing to revoke an issued concealed pistol license or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license;(f) For errors in preparing or transmitting information as part of determining a person's eligibility to receive or possess a firearm, or eligibility for a concealed pistol license or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license;(g) For issuing a dealer's license to a person ineligible for such a license; or(h) For failing to issue a dealer's license to a person eligible for such a license.(2) An application may be made to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of mandamus:(a) Directing an issuing agency to issue a concealed pistol license or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license wrongfully refused;(b) Directing the Washington state patrol firearms background check program to approve an application to purchase a firearm wrongfully denied;(c) Directing that erroneous information resulting either in the wrongful refusal to issue a concealed pistol license or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license or in the wrongful denial of a purchase application for a firearm be corrected; or(d) Directing a law enforcement agency to approve a dealer's license wrongfully denied.The application for the writ may be made in the county in which the application for a concealed pistol license or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license or an application to purchase a firearm was made, or in Thurston county, at the discretion of the petitioner. A court shall provide an expedited hearing for an application brought under this subsection (2) for a writ of mandamus. A person granted a writ of mandamus under this subsection (2) shall be awarded reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.Sec. 13. RCW 9.41.0975 and 2025 c 370 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The state, local governmental entities, any public or private agency, and the employees of any state or local governmental entity or public or private agency, acting in good faith, are immune from liability:(a) For failure to prevent the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person whose receipt or possession of the firearm is unlawful;(b) For preventing the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person who may lawfully receive or possess a firearm;(c) For issuing a permit to purchase firearms, concealed pistol license, or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license to a person ineligible for such a license;(d) For failing to issue a permit to purchase firearms, concealed pistol license, or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license to a person eligible for such a license;(e) For revoking or failing to revoke an issued permit to purchase firearms, concealed pistol license, or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license;(f) For errors in preparing or transmitting information as part of determining a person's eligibility to receive or possess a firearm, or eligibility for a permit to purchase firearms, concealed pistol license, or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license;(g) For issuing a dealer's license to a person ineligible for such a license; or(h) For failing to issue a dealer's license to a person eligible for such a license.(2) An application may be made to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of mandamus:(a) Directing an issuing agency to issue a concealed pistol license, permit to purchase firearms, or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license wrongfully refused, or to reinstate a concealed pistol license or permit to purchase firearms wrongfully revoked;(b) Directing the Washington state patrol firearms background check program to approve an application to purchase a firearm wrongfully denied;(c) Directing that erroneous information resulting either in the wrongful refusal to issue a permit to purchase firearms, concealed pistol license, or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license or in the wrongful denial of an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm be corrected; or(d) Directing a law enforcement agency to approve a dealer's license wrongfully denied.The application for the writ may be made in the county in which the application for a permit to purchase firearms, concealed pistol license, or ((alien))noncitizen firearm license or an application to purchase a firearm was made, or in Thurston county, at the discretion of the petitioner. A court shall provide an expedited hearing for an application brought under this subsection (2) for a writ of mandamus. A person granted a writ of mandamus under this subsection (2) shall be awarded reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.Sec. 14. RCW 9.41.121 and 2025 c 370 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person may apply for a permit to purchase firearms with the Washington state patrol firearms background check program.(2) An applicant for a permit to purchase firearms must submit to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program:(a) A completed permit application as provided in subsection (3) of this section;(b) A complete set of fingerprints taken by the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the applicant resides;(c) A certificate of completion of a certified firearms safety training program within the last five years, or proof that the applicant is exempt from the training requirement, as provided in RCW 9.41.1132; and(d) The permit application fee as provided in subsection (11) of this section.(3) An application for a permit to purchase firearms must include the applicant's:(a) Full name and place and date of birth;(b) Residential address and current mailing address if different from the residential address;(c) Driver's license number or state identification card number;(d) Physical description;(e) Race and gender;(f) Telephone number and email address, at the option of the applicant; and(g) Electronic signature.(4) The application must contain questions about the applicant's eligibility to possess firearms under state and federal law and whether the applicant is a United States citizen. If the applicant is not a United States citizen, the applicant must provide the applicant's country of citizenship, United States-issued alien number or admission number, and the basis on which the applicant claims to be exempt from federal prohibitions on firearm possession by ((aliens))noncitizens. The applicant shall not be required to produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.173 upon application.(5) A signed application for a permit to purchase firearms shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that courts, the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a permit to purchase firearms to an inquiring court or the Washington state patrol firearms background check program.(6) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall issue a permit to purchase firearms to an eligible applicant, or deny the completed application, within 30 days of the date the completed application was filed, or within 60 days of when the completed application was filed if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive 90 days, unless additional time is necessary in order to obtain all required information and records needed for determining the applicant's eligibility for the permit.(7)(a) A permit to purchase firearms shall be issued unless the applicant is disqualified because the applicant:(i) Is prohibited from purchasing or possessing a firearm under state or federal law;(ii) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms issued pursuant to chapter 7.105, 9A.40, 9A.44, 9A.46, 9A.88, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26B, or 26.26A RCW, or any of the former chapters 10.14, 26.10, and 26.50 RCW;(iii) Has an outstanding warrant for the applicant's arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor making a person ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040; or(iv) Has failed to produce a certificate of completion of a certified firearms safety training program within the last five years, or proof that the applicant is exempt from the training requirement.(b) If an application for a permit to purchase firearms is denied, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall send the applicant a written notice of the denial stating the specific grounds on which the permit to purchase firearms is denied. If the applicant provides an email address at the time of application, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program may send the denial notice to the applicant's email address.(8)(a) In determining whether the applicant is eligible for a permit to purchase firearms, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall check with the national instant criminal background check system, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the health care authority electronic database, the administrative office of the courts, LInX-NW, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate.(b) A background check for an original permit must be conducted through the Washington state patrol criminal records division and shall include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation through the submission of fingerprints. The results will be returned to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program. The applicant may request and receive a copy of the results of the background check from the Washington state patrol. If the applicant seeks to amend or correct their record, the applicant must contact the Washington state patrol for a Washington state record or the federal bureau of investigation for records from other jurisdictions.(9) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall develop procedures to verify on an annual basis that persons who have been issued a permit to purchase firearms remain eligible to possess firearms under state and federal law and continue to meet other firearm eligibility requirements. If a person is determined to be ineligible, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall revoke the permit under subsection (14) of this section, and provide notification of the revocation and relevant information to the chief of police or the sheriff of the jurisdiction in which the permit holder resides so that local law enforcement may take steps to ensure the permit holder is not illegally in possession of firearms.(10) The permit to purchase firearms must be in a form prescribed by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program and must contain a unique permit number, expiration date, and the name, date of birth, residential address, and brief description of the licensee.(11)(a) A permit to purchase firearms is valid for a period of five years. A person may renew a permit to purchase firearms by applying for renewal in accordance with the requirements of this section within 90 days before or after the expiration date of the permit. A renewed permit to purchase firearms takes effect on the expiration date of the prior permit to purchase firearms and is valid for a period of five years.(b)(i) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program may charge permit application fees which will cover as nearly as practicable the direct and indirect costs to the Washington state patrol incurred in creating and administering the permit to purchase firearms program. The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall establish a late penalty for late renewal of a permit to purchase firearms. The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall transmit the fees collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state firearms background check system account created in RCW 43.43.590.(ii) In addition to the permit application fee, an applicant for a permit to purchase firearms must pay the fingerprint processing fee under RCW 43.43.742.(12) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall mail a renewal notice to the holder of a permit to purchase firearms approximately 90 days before the expiration date of the permit at the address listed on the application, or to the permit holder's new address if the permit holder has notified the Washington state patrol firearms background check program of a change of address. If the permit holder provides an email address at the time of application, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program may send the renewal notice to the permit holder's email address. The notice must contain the date the permit to purchase firearms will expire, the amount of the renewal fee, the penalty for late renewal, and instructions on how to renew the permit to purchase firearms.(13) A permit to purchase firearms issued under this section does not authorize the holder of the permit to carry a concealed pistol.(14) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall revoke a permit to purchase firearms on the occurrence of any act or condition that would prevent the issuance of a permit to purchase firearms. The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall send the permit holder a written notice of the revocation stating the specific grounds on which the permit is revoked.(15) If a permit application is denied or a permit is revoked, a person aggrieved by the denial or revocation is entitled to seek relief of the denial or revocation in superior court pursuant to RCW 9.41.0975.(16) Not later than one year after May 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall submit to the state legislature a report that includes all of the following information for the preceding year:(a) The number of permit applications submitted, issued, and denied;(b) Aggregate and anonymized demographic data on the number of applicants seeking permits that were issued, including race, gender, date of birth, and county of residence;(c) Aggregate and anonymized demographic data on the number of applicants seeking permits that were denied, including race, gender, date of birth, and county of residence;(d) The frequency with which permits were denied for each of the statutory disqualifying factors listed in this section;(e) The number of permit denial decisions appealed by permit applicants and the disposition of those appeals;(f) The number of issued permits revoked; and(g) The number of cases that the Washington state patrol has provided notice of permit revocations and relevant information to local law enforcement agencies, and the number of cases that local law enforcement agencies have taken action to remove firearms purchased with a permit that was subsequently revoked and the number of firearms recovered in such cases.Sec. 15. RCW 9.41.129 and 2019 c 3 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:The department of licensing shall keep copies or records of applications for concealed pistol licenses provided for in RCW 9.41.070, copies or records of applications for ((alien))noncitizen firearm licenses, copies or records of applications to purchase pistols or semiautomatic assault rifles provided for in RCW 9.41.090, and copies or records of pistol or semiautomatic assault rifle transfers provided for in RCW 9.41.110. The copies and records shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).Sec. 16. RCW 9.41.129 and 2025 c 370 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:The department of licensing shall keep copies or records of applications for concealed pistol licenses provided for in RCW 9.41.070, copies or records of applications for ((alien))noncitizen firearm licenses, copies or records of applications for the purchase or transfer of firearms provided for in RCW 9.41.090, and copies or records of firearm transfers provided for in RCW 9.41.110. The copies and records shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).Sec. 17. RCW 9.41.171 and 2024 c 330 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:It is a class C felony for any person who is not a citizen of the United States to carry or possess any firearm, unless the person: (1) Is a lawful permanent resident; (2) has obtained a valid ((alien))noncitizen firearm license pursuant to RCW 9.41.173; (3) is a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient lawfully employed as a peace officer as defined in RCW 10.120.010 or a corrections officer as defined in RCW 43.101.010; or (4) meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.175.Sec. 18. RCW 9.41.173 and 2021 c 215 s 95 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to obtain ((an alien))a noncitizen firearm license, a nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen residing in Washington must apply to the sheriff of the county in which he or she resides.(2) The sheriff of the county shall within sixty days after the filing of an application of a nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen residing in the state of Washington, issue ((an alien))a noncitizen firearm license to such person to carry or possess a firearm for the purposes of hunting and sport shooting. The license shall be good for two years. The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for ((alien))noncitizen firearm licenses during regular business hours. An application for a license may not be denied, unless the applicant's ((alien))noncitizen firearm license is in a revoked status, or the applicant:(a) Is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;(b) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, or RCW 9A.46.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.26B.020, or 26.26A.470, or any of the former RCW 10.14.080, 26.10.115, 26.50.060, and 26.50.070;(c) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense; or(d) Has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor.No license application shall be granted to a nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen convicted of a felony unless the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or unless RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.(3) The sheriff shall check with the national crime information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the health care authority electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm.(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of fingerprints, and signature of the applicant, a copy of the applicant's passport and visa showing the applicant is in the country legally, and a valid Washington hunting license or documentation that the applicant is a member of a sport shooting club.A signed application for ((an alien))a noncitizen firearm license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for ((an alien))a noncitizen firearm license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.The application for an original license shall include a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.The license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.The license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm. The nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen applicant shall be required to produce a passport and visa as evidence of being in the country legally.The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing. The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received under this section.(5) The sheriff has the authority to collect a nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the two-year license. The fee shall be fifty dollars plus additional charges imposed by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of the license. The fee shall be retained by the sheriff.(6) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the sheriff.(7) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this section, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.(8) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or identity on an application for ((an alien))a noncitizen firearm license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the ((alien))noncitizen firearm license of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for ((an alien))a noncitizen firearm license.Sec. 19. RCW 9.41.175 and 2009 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen, who is not a resident of Washington or a citizen of Canada, may carry or possess any firearm without having first obtained ((an alien))a noncitizen firearm license if the nonimmigrant ((alien))noncitizen possesses:(a) A valid passport and visa showing he or she is in the country legally;(b) If required under federal law, an approved United States department of justice ATF-6 NIA application and permit for temporary importation of firearms and ammunition by nonimmigrant aliens; and(c)(i) A valid hunting license issued by a state or territory of the United States; or(ii) An invitation to participate in a trade show or sport shooting event being conducted in this state, another state, or another country that is contiguous with this state.(2) A citizen of Canada may carry or possess any firearm so long as he or she possesses:(a) Valid documentation as required for entry into the United States;(b) If required under federal law, an approved United States department of justice ATF-6 NIA application and permit for temporary importation of firearms and ammunition by nonimmigrant aliens; and(c)(i) A valid hunting license issued by a state or territory of the United States; or(ii) An invitation to participate in a trade show or sport shooting event being conducted in this state, another state, or another country that is contiguous with this state.(3) For purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the firearms may only be possessed for the purpose of using them in the hunting of game while such persons are in the act of hunting, or while on a hunting trip, or while such persons are competing in a bona fide trap or skeet shoot or any other organized contest where rifles, pistols, or shotguns are used. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow ((aliens))noncitizens to hunt or fish in this state without first having obtained a regular hunting or fishing license.Sec. 20. RCW 9.94A.685 and 2011 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the limitations of this section, any ((alien))noncitizen offender committed to the custody of the department under the sentencing reform act of 1981, this chapter (( 9.94A RCW)), who has been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a final order of deportation or exclusion, may be placed on conditional release status and released to the immigration and customs enforcement agency for deportation at any time prior to the expiration of the offender's term of confinement. Conditional release shall continue until the expiration of the statutory maximum sentence provided by law for the crime or crimes of which the offender was convicted. If the offender has multiple current convictions, the statutory maximum sentence allowed by law for each crime shall run concurrently.(2) No offender may be released under this section unless the secretary or the secretary's designee has reached an agreement with the immigration and customs enforcement agency that the ((alien))noncitizen offender placed on conditional release status will be detained in total confinement at a facility operated by the immigration and customs enforcement agency pending the offender's return to the country of origin or other location designated in the final deportation or exclusion order.No offender may be released under this section who is serving a sentence for a violent offense or sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.(3) The unserved portion of the term of confinement of any offender released under this section shall be tolled at the time the offender is released to the immigration and customs enforcement agency for deportation. Upon the release of an offender to the immigration and customs enforcement agency, the department shall issue a warrant for the offender's arrest within the United States. This warrant shall remain in effect indefinitely.(4) Upon arrest of an offender, the department may seek extradition as necessary and the offender may be returned to the department for completion of the unserved portion of the offender's term of total confinement. If returned, the offender shall also be required to fully comply with all the terms and conditions of the sentence.(5) ((Alien))Noncitizen offenders released to the immigration and customs enforcement agency for deportation under this section are not thereby relieved of their obligation to pay restitution or other legal financial obligations ordered by the sentencing court.(6) Any offender released pursuant to this section who returns illegally to the United States may not thereafter be released again pursuant to this section.(7) The secretary is authorized to take all reasonable actions to implement this section and shall assist federal authorities in prosecuting ((alien))noncitizen offenders who may illegally reenter the United States and enter the state of Washington.(8) The provisions of this section apply to persons convicted before, on, or after April 29, 2011.Sec. 21. RCW 13.50.260 and 2023 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The court shall hold regular sealing hearings. During these regular sealing hearings, the court shall administratively seal an individual's juvenile record pursuant to the requirements of this subsection. Although the juvenile record shall be sealed, the social file may be available to any juvenile justice or care agency when an investigation or case involving the juvenile subject of the records is being prosecuted by the juvenile justice or care agency or when the juvenile justice or care agency is assigned the responsibility of supervising the juvenile. The juvenile respondent's presence is not required at any administrative sealing hearing.(b) At the disposition hearing of a juvenile offender, the court shall schedule an administrative sealing hearing to take place during the first regularly scheduled sealing hearing after the latest of the following events that apply:(i) The respondent's eighteenth birthday;(ii) Anticipated end date of a respondent's probation, if ordered;(iii) Anticipated release from confinement at the juvenile rehabilitation administration, or the completion of parole, if the respondent is transferred to the juvenile rehabilitation administration.(c) The court shall not schedule an administrative sealing hearing at the disposition and no administrative sealing hearing shall occur if one of the offenses for which the court has entered a disposition is at the time of commission of the offense:(i) A most serious offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;(ii) A sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW; or(iii) A drug offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.(d) At the time of the scheduled administrative sealing hearing, the court shall enter a written order sealing the respondent's juvenile court record pursuant to this subsection if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent is no longer on supervision for the case being considered for sealing and has paid the full amount of restitution owing to the individual victim named in the restitution order, excluding restitution owed to any public or private entity providing insurance coverage or health care coverage. In determining whether the respondent is on supervision or owes restitution, the court shall take judicial notice of court records, including records of the county clerk, and, if necessary, sworn testimony from a representative of the juvenile department.(e) At the time of the administrative sealing hearing, if the court finds the respondent remains on supervision for the case being considered for sealing, then the court shall continue the administrative sealing hearing to a date within thirty days following the anticipated end date of the respondent's supervision. At the next administrative sealing hearing, the court shall again determine the respondent's eligibility for sealing his or her juvenile court record pursuant to (d) of this subsection, and, if necessary, continue the hearing again as provided in this subsection.(f)(i) During the administrative sealing hearing, if the court finds the respondent is no longer on supervision for the case being considered for sealing, but the respondent has not paid the full amount of restitution owing to the individual victim named in the restitution order, excluding any public or private entity providing insurance coverage or health care coverage, the court shall deny sealing the juvenile court record in a written order that: (A) Specifies the amount of restitution that remains unpaid to the original victim, excluding any public or private entity providing insurance coverage or health care coverage; and (B) provides direction to the respondent on how to pursue the sealing of records associated with this cause of action.(ii) Within five business days of the entry of the written order denying the request to seal a juvenile court record, the juvenile court department staff shall notify the respondent of the denial by providing a copy of the order of denial to the respondent in person or in writing mailed to the respondent's last known address in the department of licensing database or the respondent's address provided to the court, whichever is more recent.(iii) At any time following entry of the written order denying the request to seal a juvenile court record, the respondent may contact the juvenile court department, provide proof of payment of the remaining unpaid restitution to the original victim, excluding any public or private entity providing insurance coverage or health care coverage, and request an administrative sealing hearing. Upon verification of the satisfaction of the restitution payment, the juvenile court department staff shall circulate for signature an order sealing the file, and file the signed order with the clerk's office, who shall seal the record.(iv) The administrative office of the courts must ensure that sealed juvenile records remain private in case of an appeal and are either not posted or redacted from any clerks papers that are posted online with the appellate record, as well as taking any other prudent steps necessary to avoid exposing sealed juvenile records to the public.(2) Except for dismissal of a deferred disposition under RCW 13.40.127, the court shall enter a written order immediately sealing the official juvenile court record upon the acquittal after a fact finding or upon the dismissal of charges with prejudice, subject to the state's right, if any, to appeal the dismissal.(3) If a juvenile court record has not already been sealed pursuant to this section, in any case in which information has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and referred for diversion pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person who is the subject of the information or complaint may file a motion with the court to have the court vacate its order and findings, if any; resolve the status of any debts owing; and, subject to RCW 13.50.050(13), order the sealing of the official juvenile court record, the social file, and records of the court and of any other agency in the case, with the exception of identifying information under RCW 13.50.050(13).(4)(a) The court shall grant any motion to seal records for class A offenses made pursuant to subsection (3) of this section if:(i) Since the last date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition, the person has spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in an adjudication or conviction;(ii) No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a juvenile offense or a criminal offense;(iii) No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with that person;(iv) The person is no longer required to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 or has been relieved of the duty to register under RCW 9A.44.143 if the person was convicted of a sex offense;(v) The person has not been convicted of rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, or indecent liberties that was actually committed with forcible compulsion; and(vi) The person has paid the full amount of restitution owing to the individual victim named in the restitution order, excluding restitution owed to any public or private entity providing insurance coverage or health care coverage.(b) The court shall grant any motion to seal records for class B, class C, gross misdemeanor, and misdemeanor offenses and diversions made under subsection (3) of this section if:(i) Since the date of last release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, entry of disposition, or completion of the diversion agreement, the person has spent two consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any offense or crime;(ii) No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a juvenile offense or a criminal offense;(iii) No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with that person;(iv) The person is no longer required to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 or has been relieved of the duty to register under RCW 9A.44.143 if the person was convicted of a sex offense; and(v) The person has paid the full amount of restitution owing to the individual victim named in the restitution order, excluding restitution owed to any insurance provider authorized under Title 48 RCW.(c) Notwithstanding the requirements in (a) or (b) of this subsection, the court shall grant any motion to seal records of any deferred disposition vacated under RCW 13.40.127(9) prior to June 7, 2012, if restitution has been paid and the person is eighteen years of age or older at the time of the motion.(5) The person making a motion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecution and to any person or agency whose records are sought to be sealed.(6)(a) If the court enters a written order sealing the juvenile court record pursuant to this section, it shall, subject to RCW 13.50.050(13), order sealed the official juvenile court record, the social file, and other records relating to the case as are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the case shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the records may reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records of which are sealed. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning confidential or sealed records that records are confidential, and no information can be given about the existence or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.(b) In the event the subject of the juvenile records receives a full and unconditional pardon, the proceedings in the matter upon which the pardon has been granted shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the records may reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events upon which the pardon was received. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning the records pertaining to the events for which the subject received a pardon that records are confidential, and no information can be given about the existence or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.(c) Effective July 1, 2019, the department of licensing may release information related to records the court has ordered sealed only to the extent necessary to comply with federal law and regulation.(7) Inspection of the files and records included in the order to seal may thereafter be permitted only by order of the court upon motion made by the person who is the subject of the information or complaint, except as otherwise provided in RCW 13.50.010(8) and 13.50.050(13).(8)(a) Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent to sealing has the effect of nullifying a sealing order; however, the court may order the juvenile court record resealed upon disposition of the subsequent matter if the case meets the sealing criteria under this section and the court record has not previously been resealed.(b) Any charging of an adult felony subsequent to the sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order.(c) The administrative office of the courts shall ensure that the superior court judicial information system provides prosecutors access to information on the existence of sealed juvenile records.(d) The Washington state patrol shall ensure that the Washington state identification system provides Washington state criminal justice agencies access to sealed juvenile records information.(e) The Washington state patrol shall ensure that the Washington state identification system provides non-Washington criminal justice agencies access to sealed juvenile records only for the purposes of processing and purchasing firearms, concealed pistol licenses, or ((alien))noncitizen firearms licenses, or releasing of firearms from evidence.(f) Non-Washington criminal justice agencies that access sealed juvenile records pursuant to this subsection shall not knowingly disseminate the accessed records or any information derived therefrom to any third party. Dissemination of such records or such information shall subject the disseminating agency to the jurisdiction of the courts of Washington and a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 per violation.(9) If the juvenile court record has been sealed pursuant to this section, the record of an employee is not admissible in an action for liability against the employer based on the former juvenile offender's conduct to show that the employer knew or should have known of the juvenile record of the employee. The record may be admissible, however, if a background check conducted or authorized by the employer contained the information in the sealed record.(10) County clerks may interact or correspond with the respondent, his or her parents, restitution recipients, and any holders of potential assets or wages of the respondent for the purposes of collecting an outstanding legal financial obligation after juvenile court records have been sealed pursuant to this section.(11) Persons and agencies that obtain sealed juvenile records information pursuant to this section may communicate about this information with the respondent, but may not disseminate or be compelled to release the information to any person or agency not specifically granted access to sealed juvenile records in this section.(12) All criminal justice agencies must not disclose confidential information or sealed records accessed through the Washington state identification system or other means, and no information can be given to third parties, other than criminal justice agencies, about the existence or nonexistence of confidential or sealed records concerning an individual.Sec. 22. RCW 18.165.030 and 2012 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain a private investigator license:(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;(2) Be a citizen or resident ((alien))noncitizen of the United States;(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of a private investigator and the director determines that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director shall make her or his determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;(4) Be employed by or have an employment offer from a private investigator agency or be licensed as a private investigator agency;(5) Submit a set of fingerprints; however, if an applicant has been issued a license as a private security guard under chapter 18.170 RCW within the last twelve months, the applicant is not required to undergo a separate background check to become licensed under this chapter;(6) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application; and(7) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper identification on a form prescribed by the director for each company of employment.Sec. 23. RCW 18.170.030 and 2012 c 118 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain a private security guard license:(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;(2) Be a citizen of the United States or a resident ((alien))noncitizen;(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of a private security guard, and the director determines that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director shall make her or his determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;(4) Be employed by or have an employment offer from a licensed private security company or be licensed as a private security company;(5) Satisfy the training requirements established by the director;(6) Submit a set of fingerprints; however, if an applicant has been issued a license as a private investigator under chapter 18.165 RCW within the last twelve months, the applicant is not required to undergo a separate background check to become licensed under this chapter;(7) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application; and(8) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper identification on a form prescribed by the director for each company of employment.Sec. 24. RCW 18.185.250 and 2008 c 105 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:An applicant must meet the following requirements to obtain a bail bond recovery agent license:(1) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper identification on a form prescribed by the director;(2) Pass an examination determined by the director to measure his or her knowledge and competence in the bail recovery business;(3) Be at least twenty-one years old;(4) Be a citizen or ((legal resident alien of))noncitizen legally residing in the United States;(5) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly relates to a capacity to perform the duties of a bail bond recovery agent, and that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director shall make the director's determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;(6) Not have had certification as a peace officer revoked or denied under chapter 43.101 RCW, unless certification has subsequently been reinstated under RCW 43.101.115;(7) Submit a receipt showing payment for a background check through the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation;(8) Have a current firearms certificate issued by the commission if carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her duties as a bail bond recovery agent;(9)(a) Have a current license or equivalent permit to carry a concealed pistol;(b) A resident ((alien))noncitizen must provide a copy of his or her ((alien))noncitizen firearm license; and(10)(a) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application for a bail bond recovery agent license;(b) A bail bond agent or qualified agent who wishes to perform the duties of a bail bond recovery agent must first obtain a bail bond recovery agent endorsement to his or her bail bond agent or agency license in order to act as a bail bond recovery agent, and pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application for a bail bond recovery agent endorsement.Sec. 25. RCW 19.220.010 and 2021 c 215 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each international matchmaking organization doing business in Washington state shall disseminate to a recruit, upon request, state background check information and personal history information relating to any Washington state resident about whom any information is provided to the recruit, in the recruit's native language. The organization shall notify all recruits that background check and personal history information is available upon request. The notice that background check and personal history information is available upon request shall be in the recruit's native language and shall be displayed in a manner that separates it from other information, is highly noticeable, and in lettering not less than one-quarter of an inch high.(2) If an international matchmaking organization receives a request for information from a recruit pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the organization shall notify the Washington state resident of the request. Upon receiving notification, the Washington state resident shall obtain from the state patrol and provide to the organization the complete transcript of any background check information provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.760 based on a submission of fingerprint impressions and provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.838 and shall provide to the organization his or her personal history information. The organization shall require the resident to affirm that personal history information is complete and accurate. The organization shall refrain from knowingly providing any further services to the recruit or the Washington state resident in regards to facilitating future interaction between the recruit and the Washington state resident until the organization has obtained the requested information and provided it to the recruit.(3) This section does not apply to a traditional matchmaking organization of a religious nature that otherwise operates in compliance with the laws of the countries of the recruits of such organization and the laws of the United States nor to any organization that does not charge a fee to any party for the service provided.(4) As used in this section:(a) "International matchmaking organization" means a corporation, partnership, business, or other legal entity, whether or not organized under the laws of the United States or any state, that does business in the United States and for profit offers to Washington state residents, including ((aliens))noncitizens lawfully admitted for permanent residence and residing in Washington state, dating, matrimonial, or social referral services involving citizens of a foreign country or countries who are not residing in the United States, by: (i) An exchange of names, telephone numbers, addresses, or statistics; (ii) selection of photographs; or (iii) a social environment provided by the organization in a country other than the United States.(b) "Personal history information" means a declaration of the person's current marital status, the number of previous marriages, annulments, and dissolutions for the person, and whether any previous marriages occurred as a result of receiving services from an international matchmaking organization; founded allegations of child abuse or neglect; and any existing orders under chapter 7.105 or 10.99 RCW, or any of the former chapters 7.90, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW. Personal history information shall include information from the state of Washington and any information from other states or countries.(c) "Recruit" means a noncitizen, nonresident person, recruited by an international matchmaking organization for the purpose of providing dating, matrimonial, or social referral services.Sec. 26. RCW 28A.300.390 and 2000 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The legislature finds that:(1) In order to adequately prepare our youth for their meaningful participation in our democratic institutions and processes, there must be strong educational resources aimed at teaching students and the public about the fragile nature of our constitutional rights.(2) The federal commission on wartime relocation and internment of civilians was established by congress in 1980 to review the facts and circumstances surrounding executive order 9066, issued on February 19, 1942, and the impact of the executive order on American citizens and permanent residents, and to recommend appropriate remedies.The commission ((of [on]))on wartime relocation and internment of civilians issued a report of its findings in 1983 with the reports "Personal Justice Denied" and "Personal Justice Denied-Part II, Recommendations." The reports were based on information gathered through twenty days of hearings in cities across the country, particularly the west coast. Testimony was heard from more than seven hundred fifty witnesses, including evacuees, former government officials, public figures, interested citizens, historians, and other professionals who have studied the internment of Japanese-Americans during World War II.(3) The lessons to be learned from the internment of Japanese-Americans during World War II are embodied in "Personal Justice Denied-Part II, Recommendations" which found that executive order 9066 was not justified by military necessity, and the decisions that followed from it were not founded upon military considerations. These decisions included the exclusion and detention of American citizens and resident ((aliens))noncitizens of Japanese descent. The broad historical causes that shaped these decisions were race prejudice, war hysteria, and a failure of political leadership. Widespread ignorance about Americans of Japanese descent contributed to a policy conceived in haste and executed in an atmosphere of fear and anger at Japan. A grave personal injustice was done to the American citizens and resident ((aliens))noncitizens of Japanese ancestry who, without individual review or any probative evidence against them were excluded, removed, and detained by the United States during World War II.(4) A grave injustice was done to both citizens and permanent residents of Japanese ancestry by the evacuation, relocation, and internment of civilians during World War II. These actions were carried out without adequate security reasons and without any documented acts of espionage or sabotage, and were motivated largely by racial prejudice, wartime hysteria, and a failure of political leadership. The excluded individuals of Japanese ancestry suffered enormous damages, both material and intangible, and there were incalculable losses in education and job training, all of which resulted in significant human suffering for which appropriate compensation has not been made. For these fundamental violations of the basic civil liberties and constitutional rights of these individuals of Japanese ancestry, the United States congress apologized on behalf of the nation in the federal civil liberties act of 1988.Sec. 27. RCW 28A.300.395 and 2000 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The legislature intends to develop a grant program to fund public educational activities and development of educational materials to ensure that the events surrounding the exclusion, forced removal, and internment of civilians and permanent resident ((aliens))noncitizens of Japanese ancestry will be remembered, and so that the causes and circumstances of this and similar events may be illuminated and understood.Sec. 28. RCW 41.32.240 and 1994 c 197 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All teachers employed full time in the public schools shall be members of the system except ((alien))noncitizen teachers who have been granted a temporary permit to teach as exchange teachers.(2) A minimum of ninety days or the equivalent of ninety days of employment during a fiscal year shall be required to establish membership. A teacher shall be considered as employed full time if serving regularly for four-fifths or more of a school day or if assigned to duties which are the equivalent of four-fifths or more of a full time assignment. A teacher who is employed for less than full time service may become a member by filing an application with the retirement system, submitting satisfactory proof of teaching service and making the necessary payment before June 30 of the school year immediately following the one during which the service was rendered.(3) After June 30th of the school year immediately following the one during which the less than full-time service was rendered, the necessary payment may be made under RCW 41.50.165(2).Sec. 29. RCW 51.04.030 and 2024 c 62 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director shall supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician assistants governed by the provisions of chapter 18.71A RCW, including chiropractic care, and including care provided by licensed advanced registered nurse practitioners, to workers injured during the course of their employment at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment: PROVIDED, That the medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule after consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee established in RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may recommend to an injured worker particular health care services and providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost-effective payment levels or rates are obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may enter into contracts for goods and services including, but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide access to quality service is maintained for injured workers.(2) The director shall, in consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist, licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistants as defined in chapter 18.71A RCW, acting under the supervision of or in coordination with a participating physician, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or other agency or person rendering services to injured workers. The department shall coordinate with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered under this title, including services provided to injured workers, whether ((aliens))noncitizens or other injured workers, who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule and its associated billing or payment instructions and policies constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16).(3) The director or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a record of the commencement of every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of injured workers, shall approve and pay those which conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules, regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted under it.Sec. 30. RCW 51.04.030 and 2025 c 58 s 5112 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director shall supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician assistants governed by the provisions of chapter 18.71A RCW, including chiropractic care, and including care provided by licensed advanced practice registered nurses, to workers injured during the course of their employment at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment: PROVIDED, That the medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule after consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee established in RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may recommend to an injured worker particular health care services and providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost-effective payment levels or rates are obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may enter into contracts for goods and services including, but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide access to quality service is maintained for injured workers.(2) The director shall, in consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistants as defined in chapter 18.71A RCW, acting under the supervision of or in coordination with a participating physician, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or other agency or person rendering services to injured workers. The department shall coordinate with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered under this title, including services provided to injured workers, whether ((aliens))noncitizens or other injured workers, who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule and its associated billing or payment instructions and policies constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16).(3) The director or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a record of the commencement of every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of injured workers, shall approve and pay those which conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules, regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted under it.Sec. 31. RCW 51.32.110 and 2020 c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As required under RCW 51.36.070, any worker entitled to receive any benefits or claiming such under this title shall, if requested by the department or self-insurer, submit himself or herself for medical examination, at a place reasonably convenient for the worker. An injured worker, whether ((an alien))a noncitizen or other injured worker, who is not residing in the United States at the time that a medical examination is requested may be required to submit to an examination at any location in the United States determined by the department or self-insurer.(2) If the worker refuses to submit to medical examination, or obstructs the same, or, if any injured worker shall persist in unsanitary or injurious practices which tend to imperil or ((retard))delay his or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit to such medical or surgical treatment as is reasonably essential to his or her recovery or refuse or obstruct evaluation or examination for the purpose of vocational rehabilitation or does not cooperate in reasonable efforts at such rehabilitation, the department or the self-insurer upon approval by the department, with notice to the worker may suspend any further action on any claim of such worker so long as such refusal, obstruction, noncooperation, or practice continues and reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation for such period: PROVIDED, That (a) the department or the self-insurer shall not suspend any further action on any claim of a worker or reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation if a worker has good cause for refusing to submit to or to obstruct any examination, evaluation, treatment or practice requested by the department or required under this section and (b) the department may not assess a no-show fee against the worker if the worker gives at least five business days' notice of the worker's intent not to attend the examination.(3) If the worker necessarily incurs traveling expenses in attending the examination pursuant to the request of the department, such traveling expenses shall be repaid to him or her out of the accident fund upon proper voucher and audit or shall be repaid by the self-insurer, as the case may be.(4)(a) If the medical examination required by this section causes the worker to be absent from his or her work without pay:(i) In the case of a worker insured by the department, the worker shall be paid compensation out of the accident fund in an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work while attending the medical examination; or(ii) In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, the self-insurer shall pay the worker an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work while attending the medical examination.(b) This subsection (4) shall apply prospectively to all claims regardless of the date of injury.Sec. 32. RCW 51.32.130 and 1961 c 23 s 51.32.130 are each amended to read as follows:In case of death or permanent total disability, the monthly payment provided may be converted, in whole or in part, into a lump sum payment, not in any case to exceed eight thousand five hundred dollars, equal or proportionate, as the case may be, to the value of the annuity then remaining, to be fixed and certified by the state insurance commissioner, in which event the monthly payments shall cease in whole or in part accordingly or proportionately. Such conversion may be made only upon written application (in case of minor children the application may be by either parent) to the department and shall rest in the discretion of the department. Within the rule aforesaid the amount and value of the lump sum payment may be agreed upon between the department and applicant. In the event any payment shall be due to ((an alien))a noncitizen residing in a foreign country, the department may settle the same by making a lump sum payment in such amount as may be agreed to by such ((alien))noncitizen, not to exceed fifty percent of the value of the annuity then remaining.Nothing herein shall preclude the department from making, and authority is hereby given it to make, on its own motion, lump sum payments equal or proportionate, as the case may be, to the value of the annuity then remaining, in full satisfaction of claims due to dependents.Sec. 33. RCW 51.32.140 and 1997 c 325 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:Except as otherwise provided by treaty or this title, whenever compensation is payable to a beneficiary who is ((an alien))a noncitizen not residing in the United States, the department or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall pay the compensation to which a resident beneficiary is entitled under this title. But if a nonresident ((alien))noncitizen beneficiary is a citizen of a government having a compensation law which excludes citizens of the United States, either resident or nonresident, from partaking of the benefit of such law in as favorable a degree as herein extended to nonresident ((aliens))noncitizens, he or she shall receive no compensation. No payment shall be made to any beneficiary residing in any country with which the United States does not maintain diplomatic relations when such payment is due.Sec. 34. RCW 64.16.005 and 2012 c 117 s 195 are each amended to read as follows:Any ((alien))noncitizen may acquire and hold lands, or any right thereto, or interest therein, by purchase, devise, or descent; and he or she may convey, mortgage, and devise the same, and if he or she shall die intestate, the same shall descend to his or her heirs, and in all cases such lands shall be held, conveyed, mortgaged, or devised, or shall descend in like manner and with like effect as if such ((alien))noncitizen were a native citizen of this state or of the United States.Sec. 35. RCW 64.16.140 and 1967 c 163 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:All lands and all estates or interests in lands, within the state of Washington, which were conveyed or attempted to be conveyed to, or acquired or attempted to be acquired by, any ((alien or aliens))noncitizen or noncitizens, prior to the date of the adoption of this act, are hereby confirmed to the respective persons at present owning or claiming to own the title thereto derived by, through or under any such ((alien))noncitizen ownership or attempted ownership, to the extent that title was vested in or conveyed by said ((alien or aliens))noncitizen or noncitizens: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall be construed to affect, adversely or otherwise, any title to any such lands, or to any interest or estate therein, held or claimed by any private person or corporation adversely to the title hereby confirmed.Sec. 36. RCW 71.05.620 and 2024 c 209 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The files and records of court proceedings under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW shall be closed but shall be accessible to:(a) The department;(b) The department of social and health services;(c) The authority;(d) The state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010;(e) Any person who is the subject of a petition;(f) The attorney or guardian of the person;(g) Resource management services for that person;(h) Service providers authorized to receive such information by resource management services;(i) The Washington state patrol firearms background division to conduct background checks for processing and purchasing firearms, concealed pistol licenses, ((alien))noncitizen firearms licenses, firearm rights restoration petitions under chapter 9.41 RCW, and release of firearms from evidence, including appeals of denial;(j) The prosecuting attorney of a county or tribe located in this state; and(k) The tribe or Indian health care provider who has the right to intervene or receive notice and copies of any orders issued by a court in any court proceeding under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW.(2) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 37. RCW 72.09.560 and 1998 c 245 s 140 are each amended to read as follows:The department is authorized to establish a camp for ((alien))noncitizen offenders and shall be ready to assign offenders to the camp not later than January 1, 1997. The secretary shall locate the camp within the boundaries of an existing department facility.Sec. 38. RCW 72.25.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:It shall be the duty of the secretary of the department of social and health services, in cooperation with the United States bureau of immigration and/or the United States department of the interior, to arrange for the deportation of all ((alien))noncitizen sexual psychopaths, psychopathic delinquents, or ((mentally ill persons))individuals with mental illness who are now confined in, or who may hereafter be committed to, any state hospital for the sexual psychopath, psychopathic delinquent, or ((the mentally ill))individuals with mental illness in this state; to transport such ((alien))noncitizen sexual psychopaths, psychopathic delinquents, or ((mentally ill persons))individuals with mental illness to such point or points as may be designated by the United States bureau of immigration or by the United States department of the interior; and to give written permission for the return of any resident of Washington now or hereafter confined in a hospital for the sexual psychopath, psychopathic delinquent, or ((the mentally ill))individuals with mental illness in a territory of the United States or in a foreign country. ((Mentally ill person))"Individual with mental illness" for the purposes of this section shall be any person defined as a mentally ill person under RCW 72.23.010, as now or hereafter amended.Sec. 39. RCW 72.25.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter the secretary may employ all help necessary in arranging for and transporting such ((alien))noncitizen and nonresident sexual psychopaths, psychopathic delinquents, or ((mentally ill persons))individuals with mental illness, and the cost and expense of providing such assistance, and all expenses incurred in effecting the transportation of such ((alien))noncitizen and nonresident sexual psychopaths, psychopathic delinquents, or ((mentally ill persons))individuals with mental illness, shall be paid from the funds appropriated for that purpose upon vouchers approved by the department. ((Mentally ill person))"Individual with mental illness" for the purposes of this section shall be any person defined as a mentally ill person under RCW 72.23.010, as now or hereafter amended.Sec. 40. RCW 72.27.070 and 1979 c 141 s 234 are each amended to read as follows:Nothing in this chapter shall affect the right of the secretary of social and health services to deport ((aliens))noncitizens and return residents of nonparty states as provided in chapter 72.25 RCW.Sec. 41. RCW 74.04.805 and 2023 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department is responsible for determining eligibility for referral for essential needs and housing support under RCW 43.185C.220. Persons eligible for a referral are persons who:(a) Have been determined to be eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program under RCW 74.62.030 or the pregnant women assistance program under RCW 74.62.030, or are incapacitated from gainful employment by reason of bodily or mental infirmity that will likely continue for a minimum of 90 days. The standard for incapacity in this subsection, as evidenced by the 90-day duration standard, is not intended to be as stringent as federal supplemental security income disability standards;(b) Are citizens or ((aliens))noncitizens lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of law, or are victims of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005;(c)(i) Have furnished the department with their social security number. If the social security number cannot be furnished because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a number must be made prior to authorization of benefits, and the social security number must be provided to the department upon receipt;(ii) This requirement does not apply to victims of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005 if they have not been issued a social security number;(d)(i) Have countable income as described in RCW 74.04.005 that meets the standard established by the department, which shall not exceed 100 percent of the federal poverty level; or(ii) Have income that meets the standard established by the department, who are eligible for the pregnant women assistance program;(e) Do not have countable resources in excess of those described in RCW 74.04.005; and(f) Are not eligible for federal aid assistance, other than basic food benefits transferred electronically and medical assistance.(2) Recipients of pregnant women assistance program benefits who meet other eligibility requirements in this section are eligible for referral for essential needs and housing support services, within funds appropriated for the department of commerce, for 24 consecutive months from the date the department determines pregnant women assistance program eligibility.(3) The following persons are not eligible for a referral for essential needs and housing support:(a) Persons who refuse or fail to cooperate in obtaining federal aid assistance, without good cause;(b) Persons who refuse or fail without good cause to participate in substance use treatment if an assessment by a certified substance use disorder professional indicates a need for such treatment. Good cause must be found to exist when a person's physical or mental condition, as determined by the department, prevents the person from participating in substance use treatment, when needed outpatient treatment is not available to the person in the county of their residence, when needed inpatient treatment is not available in a location that is reasonably accessible for the person, or when the person is a parent or other relative personally providing care for a minor child or an incapacitated individual living in the same home as the person, and child care or day care would be necessary for the person to participate in substance use disorder treatment, and such care is not available; and(c) Persons who are fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from which the person flees; or who are violating a condition of probation, community supervision, or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.(4) For purposes of determining whether a person is incapacitated from gainful employment under subsection (1) of this section:(a) The department shall adopt by rule medical criteria for incapacity determinations to ensure that eligibility decisions are consistent with statutory requirements and are based on clear, objective medical information; and(b) The process implementing the medical criteria must involve consideration of opinions of the treating or consulting physicians or health care professionals regarding incapacity, and any eligibility decision which rejects uncontroverted medical opinion must set forth clear and convincing reasons for doing so.(5) For purposes of reviewing a person's continuing eligibility and in order to remain eligible for the program, persons who have been found to have an incapacity from gainful employment must demonstrate that there has been no material improvement in their medical or mental health condition. The department may discontinue benefits when there was specific error in the prior determination that found the person eligible by reason of incapacitation.(6) The department must review the cases of all persons who have received benefits under the essential needs and housing support program for twelve consecutive months, and at least annually after the first review, to determine whether they are eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program.(7) The department shall share client data for individuals eligible for essential needs and housing support with the department of commerce and designated essential needs and housing support entities as required under RCW 43.185C.230.Sec. 42. RCW 74.62.030 and 2025 c 408 s 6 and 2025 c 403 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The aged, blind, or disabled assistance program shall provide financial grants to persons in need who:(i) Are not eligible to receive supplemental security income, refugee cash assistance, temporary assistance for needy families, or state family assistance benefits;(ii) Meet the eligibility requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and(iii) Are aged, blind, or disabled. For purposes of determining eligibility for assistance for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, the following definitions apply:(A) "Aged" means age 65 or older.(B) "Blind" means statutorily blind as defined for the purpose of determining eligibility for the federal supplemental security income program.(C) "Disabled" means likely to meet the federal supplemental security income disability standard. In making this determination, the department should give full consideration to the cumulative impact of an applicant's multiple impairments, an applicant's age, and vocational and educational history.In determining whether a person is disabled, the department may rely on, but is not limited to, the following:(I) A previous disability determination by the social security administration or the disability determination service entity within the department; or(II) A determination that an individual is eligible to receive optional categorically needy medicaid as a disabled person under the federal regulations at 42 C.F.R. Parts 435, Secs. 201(a)(3) and 210.(b) The following persons are not eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program:(i) Persons who are not able to engage in gainful employment due primarily to a substance use disorder. These persons shall be referred to appropriate assessment, treatment, or shelter services. Referrals shall be made at the time of application or at the time of eligibility review. This subsection may not be construed to prohibit the department from granting aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits to persons with a substance use disorder who are incapacitated due to other physical or mental conditions that meet the eligibility criteria for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program; or(ii) Persons for whom there has been a final determination of ineligibility based on age, blindness, or disability for federal supplemental security income benefits.(c) Persons may receive aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits and a referral for essential needs and housing program support under RCW 43.185C.220 concurrently while pending application for federal supplemental security income benefits. Effective October 1, 2028, a person's receipt of supplemental security income received for the same period as aged, blind, or disabled program assistance as described in this section shall not be considered a debt due to the state and is not subject to recovery. However, the monetary value of aged, blind, or disabled cash assistance paid prior to October 1, 2028, that is duplicated by the person's receipt of supplemental security income for the same period shall be considered a debt due to the state and shall by operation of law be subject to recovery through all available legal remedies.(2) The pregnant women assistance program shall provide financial grants to persons who:(a) Are pregnant and in need, based upon the current income and resource standards of the federal temporary assistance for needy families program, but are ineligible for federal temporary assistance for needy families or state family assistance benefits for a reason other than failure to cooperate in program requirements; and(b) Meet the eligibility requirements of subsection (3) of this section.(3) To be eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program under subsection (1) of this section or the pregnant women assistance program under subsection (2) of this section, a person must:(a) Be a citizen or ((alien))noncitizen lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of law, or be a victim of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005;(b) Meet the income and resource standards described in RCW 74.04.805(1) (b) and (c);(c)(i) Have furnished the department with their social security number. If the social security number cannot be furnished because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a number shall be made prior to authorization of benefits, and the social security number shall be provided to the department upon receipt;(ii) This requirement does not apply to victims of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005 if they have not been issued a social security number;(d) Not have refused or failed without good cause to participate in substance use treatment if an assessment by a certified substance use disorder professional indicates a need for such treatment. Good cause must be found to exist when a person's physical or mental condition, as determined by the department, prevents the person from participating in substance use treatment, when needed outpatient treatment is not available to the person in the county of their residence, when needed inpatient treatment is not available in a location that is reasonably accessible for the person, or when the person is a parent or other relative personally providing care for a minor child or an incapacitated individual living in the same home as the person, and child care or day care would be necessary for the person to participate in substance use disorder treatment, and such care is not available; and(e) Not have refused or failed to cooperate in obtaining federal aid assistance, without good cause.(4) Referrals for essential needs and housing support under RCW 43.185C.220(1)(a) shall be provided to persons found eligible under RCW 74.04.805.(5) No person may be considered an eligible individual for benefits under this section with respect to any month if during that month the person:(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from which the person flees; or(b) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision, or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.(6) The department must share client data for individuals eligible for a referral to essential needs and housing support with the department of commerce and designated essential needs and housing support entities as required under RCW 43.185C.230.Sec. 43. RCW 34.05.353 and 2004 c 31 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An agency may file notice for the expedited adoption of rules in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any one of the following criteria:(a) The proposed rules relate only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a person;(b) The proposed rules adopt or incorporate by reference without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;(c) The proposed rules only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its effect, including a proposed rule described in subsection (9) of this section;(d) The content of the proposed rules is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;(e) The proposed rules have been the subject of negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or some other process that involved substantial participation by interested parties before the development of the proposed rule; or(f) The proposed rule is being amended after a review under RCW 34.05.328.(2) An agency may file notice for the expedited repeal of rules under the procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any one of the following criteria:(a) The statute on which the rule is based has been repealed and has not been replaced by another statute providing statutory authority for the rule;(b) The statute on which the rule is based has been declared unconstitutional by a court with jurisdiction, there is a final judgment, and no statute has been enacted to replace the unconstitutional statute;(c) The rule is no longer necessary because of changed circumstances; or(d) Other rules of the agency or of another agency govern the same activity as the rule, making the rule redundant.(3) The expedited rule-making process must follow the requirements for rule making set forth in RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is not required to prepare a small business economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.025, a statement indicating whether the rule constitutes a significant legislative rule under RCW 34.05.328(5)(c)(iii), or a significant legislative rule analysis under RCW 34.05.328. An agency is not required to prepare statements of inquiry under RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a hearing for the expedited rule making. The notice for the expedited rule making must contain a statement in at least ten-point type, that is substantially in the following form:NOTICETHIS RULE IS BEING PROPOSED UNDER AN EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS THAT WILL ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A SMALL BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT, OR PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA FOR A SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU OBJECT TO THIS USE OF THE EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS IN WRITING AND THEY MUST BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME AND ADDRESS) AND RECEIVED BY (INSERT DATE).(4) The agency shall send either a copy of the notice of the proposed expedited rule making, or a summary of the information on the notice, to any person who has requested notification of proposals for expedited rule making or of regular agency rule making, as well as the joint administrative rules review committee, within three days after its publication in the Washington State Register. An agency may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed copies of these notices. The notice of the proposed expedited rule making must be preceded by a statement substantially in the form provided in subsection (3) of this section. The notice must also include an explanation of the reasons the agency believes the expedited rule-making process is appropriate.(5) The code reviser shall publish the text of all rules proposed for expedited adoption, and the citation and caption of all rules proposed for expedited repeal, along with the notice required in this section in a separate section of the Washington State Register. Once the notice of expedited rule making has been published in the Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may make in the noticed materials before their final adoption or repeal are to correct typographical errors.(6) Any person may file a written objection to the expedited rule making. The objection must be filed with the agency rules coordinator within forty-five days after the notice of the proposed expedited rule making has been published in the Washington State Register. A person who has filed a written objection to the expedited rule making may withdraw the objection.(7) ((If))Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, if no written objections to the expedited rule making are filed with the agency within forty-five days after the notice of proposed expedited rule making is published, or if all objections that have been filed are withdrawn by the persons filing the objections, the agency may enter an order adopting or repealing the rule without further notice or a public hearing. The order must be published in the manner required by this chapter for any other agency order adopting, amending, or repealing a rule.(8) ((If))Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, if a written notice of objection to the expedited rule making is timely filed with the agency and is not withdrawn, the notice of proposed expedited rule making published under this section is considered a statement of inquiry for the purposes of RCW 34.05.310, and the agency may initiate further rule-making proceedings in accordance with this chapter.(9) The proposed rules which may be filed under subsection (1)(d) of this section include any proposed rule which, pursuant to RCW 1.20.130(2), only substitutes the term "alien," when used to refer to an individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States, with the term "noncitizen" or other context-appropriate term and which makes necessary grammatical changes and definitions resulting from the substitution, but does not change the effect of a rule. Written objections to a proposed rule meeting the criteria in this subsection may be filed as described in subsection (6) of this section, however an agency may proceed with entering an order under subsection (7) of this section notwithstanding objections.(10) As used in this section, "expedited rule making" includes both the expedited adoption of rules and the expedited repeal of rules.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 44. (1) Sections 11, 13, 14, and 16 of this act take effect May 1, 2027.(2) Sections 5, 9, and 30 of this act take effect June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 45. (1) Sections 10, 12, and 15 of this act expire May 1, 2027.(2) Sections 4, 8, and 29 of this act expire June 30, 2027.--- END ---